District of Columbia statutes.
this

29-504

Construction; applicability of Chapter 3 of this title to corporations organized under

(a)

This chapter shall not repeal, modify, or restrict the laws relating to corporations, or regulating the professions covered by this chapter, unless these laws conflict with this chapter.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Chapter 3 of this title shall apply to a professional corporation organized under this chapter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-404.
1981 Ed., § 29-604.
1973 Ed., § 29-1104.

Editor's Notes

Former § 29-504 has been recodified as § 36-504.